District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.96

Repealed

Liquidation proceedings — Filing of decree of dissolution.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 219, ch. 269, § 96
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-931h.
1981 Ed., § 29-396.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.96.